District of Columbia statutes.
49-601

Discharge without honor.

An enlisted man may be discharged without honor at any time by order of the Commanding General on account of fraudulent enlistment, or on account of his being continuously absent without leave from his command for a period of not less than 3 months.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 775, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 632, ch. 146, § 26
1981 Ed., § 39-501.
1973 Ed., § 39-404.